Nebraska, session 109, LB268.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB268 LB268
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. (1) Beginning with fiscal year 2025-26, the department
shall implement an increase to reimbursement rates paid to providers of
developmental disability services equal to one hundred fifty percent of
the state minimum wage amount.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $XXX from
federal funds beginning in fiscal year 2025-26 to the department for
reimbursement rates paid to providers of developmental disability
services which shall be increased annually by an amount equal to the
change in the core Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and
Clerical Workers. Such funds shall only be used for this purpose.
Sec. 3. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-